src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_to_noun.lexc
LEXICON Z2-PZmorf !!= * @CODE@ derivationsmorfemer til tup-nominer pluralis tantum
 tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn:^T%>aluk tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+ARAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>aluaraq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1_qaZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluinnaq tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>aluinnannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluinnarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:^T%>aluinnavik tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluinnavissuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+KUQ+Der/nn:^T%>alukoq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+LIK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alu@U.Num.Pl@ Z2+lZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alulerujussuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alulissuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+TAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alulittaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alunnguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alunnguaaraq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1_qaZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alunnguaannaq tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+KULUK+Der/nn:^T%>alunnguakkuluk tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn:^T%>aluppak tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+ALUK+Der/nn:^T%>aluppaaluk tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluppaalussuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluppassuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alupalaaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alupalaannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alupalaarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PALLAK+Der/nn:^T%>aluppallak tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PALLAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluppallassuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PALUK+Der/nn:^T%>aluppaluk Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluppalussuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alorpiaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PIAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alorpiannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn:^T%>alupiluk tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alupilu@U.Num.Pl@ Z2+lZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>alupilulerujuk tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alupilulerujussuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alupilulissuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alupilussuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+RALAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>aloralaannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>alorujuk tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alorujussuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussaraluaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussaannaq tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alussa@U.Num.Pl@ Z2+lZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussarsiaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+KKAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussarsiakkaaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussarsiassaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TSIALAK+Der/nn:^T%>alussatsialak tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussatuaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alussatuannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alussuaaraq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1_qaZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>alussuaarakasik tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+KKUT+Der/nn:^T%>alussuakkut ZkkutZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussuaasaaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussuaarsaarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussuaasaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alussuaasarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+SUNNI+Der/nn:^T%>alusunni tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+TSIALAK+Der/nn:^T%>alutsialak tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>alutuaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>alutuannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+TUUQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluttooq tp ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluusaaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluusaq tpP ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>aluusannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:^T%>aluvik tup- ;
+ALUK+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>aluvissuaq Z2aqZ;
+ARAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>^ProgIaraq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1_qaZ ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>^ProgIarakasik tup- ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>arannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ararpassuaq Z2aqZ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ararpaalussuaq Z2aqZ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ararsuaq Z2aqZ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn:^T%>araasaq tpP ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>araasannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+PAJUK+Der/nn:^T%>^ProgIaraasapajuk tup- ;
+ARAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+PAJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>^ProgIaraasapajussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+ARSUK+Der/nn:^T%>arsuk tup- ;
+ARSUK+Der/nn+KULUK+Der/nn:^T%>arsukuluk tup- ;
+ARSUK+Der/nn+KULUK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>arsukulunnguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+GASAAQ+Der/nn:%>g2asaaq tp ;
+GASAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>g2asaarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+GIIT+Der/nn:%>g2iit GIIT ;
+GIIT+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn:%>g2iippak tup- ;
+GIIT+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>g2iippassuaq Z2aqZ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vn:%>g2issaarut tpt ; !undtagelsesvist medtaget i der-lexicon for at forebygge overgenerering med UTE+Der/vn
+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>innaq tup- ;
+INNAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>innannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+INNAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>innarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+INNAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+LAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>innarsualaaq laaq_nn ; !tp
+INNAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+LAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>innarsualaannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+INNAQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:^T%>innavik tup- ;
+INNAQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>innavissuaq Z2aqZ;
+KAJAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kajaaq tpP ;
+KAJAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kajaarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+KASSAK+Der/nn:^T%>kassak tup- ;
+KASSAK+Der/nn+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:^T%>kassaakka K_plur ; !De særlige -kasiikka og -kassaakka PL 20180507
+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>kasik tup- ;
+KASIK+Der/nn+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt:^T%>kasiikka K_plur ; !De særlige -kasiikka og -kassaakka PL 20180507
+KKAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kkaaq tpP ;
+KKAAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:^T%>kkaa Z2+lZ ; 
+KKAAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kkaalerujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+KKAAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kkaalissuaq Z2aqZ ;
+KKULUK+Der/nn:^T%>kkuluk tup- ;
+KKUT+Der/nn:^T%>kkut ZkkutZ ;
+KKUT+Der/nn+MIU+Der/nn:^T%>kkormiu tpP ;
+KKUT+Der/nn+MIUQ+Der/nn:^T%>kkormioq tpP ;
+KUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuk tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+ARAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuaraq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1_qaZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuarakasik tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuarannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuararsuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuaraasannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuaraasaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuugaluaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuinnaq tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuinnannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuinnarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuinnavik tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuinnavissuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuukasik tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+KULLAK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuukullak tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+KULLAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuukullassuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+LIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuliaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+LIAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuliannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+LIK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuu@U.Num.Pl@ Z2+lZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuulerujussuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuulissuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuumininnguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuumersuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuunnguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuunnguaannaq tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+KULUK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuunnguakkuluk tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujooq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuupalaaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuupalaannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuupalaarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorpiaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PIAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorpiannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuupiluk tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuupilu@U.Num.Pl@ Z2+lZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuupilulerujuk tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuupilulerujussuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuupilulissuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuupilussuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+RALAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujooralaannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorujuk tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorujussuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussaraluaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussaannaq tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussa@U.Num.Pl@ Z2+lZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussarsiaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+KKAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussarsiakkaaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussarsiassaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TSIALAK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussatsialak tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussatuaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuussatuannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorsuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorsuaaraq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1_qaZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorsuaarakasik tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+KKUT+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorsuakkut ZkkutZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorsuaasaaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorsuaarsaarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorsuaasaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujoorsuaasarsuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+TSIALAK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuutsialak tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuutuaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuutuannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuujusaaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuusaaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuusaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuujusaq tpP ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuujusannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kujuusannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuvik tup- ;
+KUJUUQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kujuuvissuaq Z2aqZ;
+KULLAK+Der/nn:^T%>kullak tup- ;
+KULLAK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kullannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KULLAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>kullassuaq Z2aqZ;
+KUQ+Der/nn:^T%>koq tpP ;
+KUQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>kunnguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+KUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>korsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+LAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>laaq tpP ;
+LAAQ+Der/nn+LIK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>laa@U.Num.Pl@ Z2+lZ ;
+LAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>laannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+LAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>laarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+LIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>liaq tpP ;
